Washington statutes.
RCW 35.51.050

Loan agreements—Assessments may be pledged.

Assessments for local improvements in a local improvement district created by a municipality may be pledged and applied when collected to the payment of its obligations under a loan agreement entered into under chapter 39.69 RCW to pay costs of improvements in such a local improvement district.

[ 1997 c 426 s 4.]